th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กอล์ฟ > ถุงกอล์ฟ: ถุงกอล์ฟแบบรถเข็น; ถุงกอล์ฟแบบมีขาตั้ง; ถุงกอล์ฟทัวร์และสตาฟฟ์; ถุงกอล์ฟซันเดย์
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Golf > Golf Çantaları: Golf arabası çantaları; Ayaklı golf çantaları; Staff ve tur golf çantaları; Pazar golf çantaları
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Golf > Golftaschen: Golf-Cartbags; Golf-Standbags; Staff- & Tour-Golfbags; Sunday-Golfbags
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Γκολφ > Τσάντες γκολφ: Τσάντες γκολφ για αμαξίδια; Τσάντες γκολφ με βάση; Τσάντες γκολφ Staff & Tour; Τσάντες γκολφ Sunday
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Голф > Чанти за голф: Чанти за голф количка; Голф чанти със стойка; Професионални голф чанти за турнир; Неделни чанти за голф
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Golf > Sacos de golfe: Bolsas de golfe para carrinho; Bolsas de golfe com suporte; Bolsas de golfe staff e tour; Bolsas de golfe Sunday
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Golf > Golfbägit: Kärrybägit; Kantobägit; Staff- ja Tour-golfbägit; Sunday-bägit
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Golf > Sacs de golf: Sacs de golf pour chariot; Sacs de golf trépied; Sacs de golf Staff et Tour; Sacs de golf Sunday
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ゴルフ > ゴルフバッグ: カートバッグ; スタンド付きゴルフバッグ; スタッフ・ツアーゴルフバッグ; サンデーバッグ
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Golf > Golftáskák: Kocsis golfzsákok; Állványos golfzsákok; Staff és Tour golfzsákok; Sunday golfzsákok
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Golf > Sacche da golf: Sacche da golf per carrello; Sacche da golf con cavalletto; Sacche da golf staff e tour; Sacche da golf sunday
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Golfe > Sacos de golfe: Sacos de golfe para carrinho; Sacos de golfe com tripé; Sacos de golfe staff e tour; Sacos de golfe sunday
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Golf > Golf Bags: Golf Cart Bags; Golf Stand Bags; Staff & Tour Golf Bags; Sunday Golf Bags
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Gôn > Túi gôn: Túi gôn gắn xe đẩy; Túi gôn có chân chống; Túi gôn cá nhân & thi đấu; Túi gôn Sunday
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Golf > Torbe za golf: Torbe za vozilo za golf; Torbe sa stalkom za golf; Torbe za osoblje i ture za golf; Nedjeljne torbe za golf
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 골프 > 골프 가방: 골프 카트백; 골프 스탠드백; 스태프 및 투어 골프백; 선데이 골프백
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Golf > Torbe za golf: Torbe za golf vozičke; Golf torbe s stojalom; Profesionalne golf torbe za turnirje; Lahke golf torbe
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Golf > Golftasker: Vognbags til golf; Bærebags til golf; Staff- og tour-golftasker; Sunday-golftasker
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 高尔夫用品 > 高尔夫球包: 高尔夫推车球包; 高尔夫支架球包; 职业和巡回赛高尔夫球包; 周日高尔夫球包
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Golf > Golfbagar: Vagnbagar; Bärbagar; Staff- och tourbagar; Söndagsbagar
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 高爾夫球 > 高爾夫球袋: 高爾夫推車球袋; 高爾夫腳架球袋; 職業與巡迴賽高爾夫球袋; Sunday 高爾夫球袋
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Golf > Bolsas de golf: Bolsas de carrito de golf; Bolsas de golf con soporte; Bolsas de golf tipo staff y tour; Bolsas de golf Sunday
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Golf > Golfové tašky: Tašky na golfové vozíky; Golfové tašky na stojanoch; Golfové tašky pre personál a na turné; Golfové tašky Sunday
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гольф > Сумки для гольфа: Сумки для гольф-каров; Сумки для гольфа с подставкой; Профессиональные и туровые сумки для гольфа; Сумки Sunday для гольфа
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Golf > Golfové pytle: Golfové bagy na vozík; Golfové bagy se stojánkem; Golfové bagy Staff a Tour; Golfové bagy typu Sunday
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Golf > Golfbager: Trallebager for golf; Bærebager for golf; Staff- og tourbager for golf; Sundaybager for golf
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Golf > Genți de golf: Genți de golf pentru cărucior; Genți de golf cu trepied; Genți de golf tip staff și tour; Genți de golf tip sunday
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Golfas > Golfo krepšiai: Golfo vežimėlių krepšiai; Golfo krepšiai su stovu; Personalo ir turo golfo krepšiai; Lengvi golfo krepšiai
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Golf > Golftassen: Cartbags; Standbags; Staff- en tour-golftassen; Sundaybags
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Golf > Torby golfowe: Torby golfowe na wózki; Torby golfowe ze stojakiem; Torby golfowe typu staff i tour; Torby golfowe typu sunday